Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1910
Filed document; evidentiary effect.

A certificate attached to a copy of a document bearing the Secretary of State's signature (which may be in facsimile) and the seal of this state is conclusive evidence that the original document is on file with the Secretary of State.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 10.